Washington statutes.
RCW 35.02.250

Corporate powers in dealings with federal government.

Any city or town incorporated as provided in this chapter shall, in addition to all other powers, duties and benefits of a city or town of the same type or class, be authorized to purchase, acquire, lease, or administer any property, real or personal, or property rights and improvements thereon owned by the federal government on such terms and conditions as may be mutually agreed upon, when authorized to do so by the United States government, and thereafter to sell, transfer, exchange, lease, or otherwise dispose of any such property, and to execute contracts with the federal government with respect to supplying water and for other utility services.

[ 1986 c 234 s 28; 1965 c 7 s 35.04.170. Prior: 1955 c 345 s 17. Formerly RCW 35.04.170.]